Utah statutes.
76-10-3105.   Exempt activities.

(1)  This act may not be construed to prohibit:

(a)  the activities of any public utility to the extent that those activities are subject to regulation by the public service commission, the state or federal department of transportation, the federal energy regulatory commission, the federal communications commission, the interstate commerce commission, or successor agencies;

(b)  the activities of any insurer, insurance producer, independent insurance adjuster, or rating organization including, but not limited to, making or participating in joint underwriting or reinsurance arrangements, to the extent that those activities are subject to regulation by the commissioner of insurance;

(c)  the activities of securities dealers, issuers, or agents, to the extent that those activities are subject to regulation under the laws of either this state or the United States;

(d)  the activities of any state or national banking institution, to the extent that the activities are regulated or supervised by state government officers or agencies under the banking laws of this state or by federal government officers or agencies under the banking laws of the United States;

(e)  the activities of any state or federal savings and loan association to the extent that those activities are regulated or supervised by state government officers or agencies under the banking laws of this state or federal government officers or agencies under the banking laws of the United States;

(f)  the activities of a political subdivision to the extent authorized or directed by state law, consistent with the state action doctrine of federal antitrust law; or

(g)  the activities of an emergency medical service provider licensed under Title 26, Chapter 8a, Utah Emergency Medical Services System Act, to the extent that those activities are regulated by state government officers or agencies under that act.

(2) (a)  The labor of a human being is not a commodity or article of commerce.

(b)  Nothing contained in the antitrust laws shall be construed to forbid the existence and operation of labor, agricultural, or horticultural organizations, instituted for the purpose of mutual help and not having capital stock or conducted for profit, or to forbid or restrain individual members of these organizations from lawfully carrying out their legitimate objects; nor may these organizations or membership in them be held to be illegal combinations or conspiracies in restraint of trade under the antitrust laws.

(3) (a)  As used in this section, an entity is also a municipality if the entity was formed under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, prior to January 1, 1981, and the entity is:

(i)  a project entity as defined in Section 11-13-103;

(ii)  an electric interlocal entity as defined in Section 11-13-103; or

(iii)  an energy services interlocal entity as defined in Section 11-13-103.

(b)  The activities of the entities under Subsection (3)(a) are authorized or directed by state law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

